Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4910.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 16650. (1) Beginning 12 months after the effective date
of the amendatory act that added this section, if a licensee is
required by rule to complete continuing education courses approved
by the board as a condition of license renewal, the board shall
consider as approved any continuing education course that meets all
of the following requirements:
(a) The course covers a subject required by rule.
(b) The course is offered by a nonprofit dental care
EMR H03374'25 (H-1) mdovha


corporation operating under 1963 PA 125, MCL 550.351 to 550.373,
that is domiciled in this state, that administers dental benefits
under Medicaid, and that is the largest provider of dental benefits
in this state measured by the number of covered individuals.
(2) As used in this section, "Medicaid" means the program of
medical assistance established under section 105 of the social
welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.105.
Sec. 16653. As Subject to section 16650, as a condition of
renewal of a license to practice under sections 16651 to 16658, a
dental therapist shall certify that he or she the dental therapist
has successfully completed 35 hours of continuing education in the
2 years before renewal. Continuing education under this section
must conform with the requirements of part 161 concerning
continuing education courses and must include board-approved
courses, including, but not limited to, a course in cardiopulmonary
resuscitation.
Final Page
EMR H03374'25 (H-1) mdovha